Hawaii statutes.
[§26-56] Commission on salaries. (a)
Pursuant to article XVI, section 3.5, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii, there is established a commission on salaries within the department of human
resources development, for administrative purposes only.

The commission shall consist of seven members
of whom:

(1) Two members shall be appointed by the governor;

(2) Two members shall be appointed by the president
of the senate;

(3) Two members shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives; and

(4) One member shall be appointed by the chief
justice of the supreme court.

Vacancies in these positions shall be filled in
the same manner. The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties.

(b) The commission shall review and recommend
an appropriate salary for the governor, lieutenant governor, members of the
legislature, justices and judges of all state courts, administrative director
of the State or an equivalent position, and department heads or executive
officers and the deputies or assistants to the department heads of the
departments of:

(1) Accounting and general services;

(2) Agriculture;

(3) The attorney general;

(4) Budget and finance;

(5) Business, economic development, and tourism;

(6) Commerce and consumer affairs;

(7) Defense;

(8) Hawaiian home lands;

(9) Health;

(10) Human resources development;

(11) Human services;

(12) Labor and industrial relations;

(13) Land and natural resources;

(14) Public safety;

(15) Taxation; and

(16) Transportation.

The commission shall not review the salary of
any position in the department of education or the University of Hawaii.

The commission may recommend different salaries
for department heads and executive officers and different salary ranges for
deputies or assistants to department heads; provided that the commission shall
recommend the same salary range for deputies or assistants to department heads
within the same department; provided further that the appointing official shall
specify the salary for a particular position within the applicable range.

The commission shall not recommend salaries
lower than salary amounts recommended by prior commissions replaced by this
section.

(c) The commission may seek assistance from
the department of human resources development and any other agency in
conducting its review, and all agencies shall fully cooperate with the
commission and provide any necessary information to the commission upon
request.

(d) The commission shall convene in the month
of November 2006, and every six years thereafter. Not later than the fortieth
legislative day of the regular session of 2007, and every six years thereafter,
the commission shall submit a report of its findings and its salary
recommendations to the legislature, through the governor. The commission may
include incremental increases that take effect prior to the convening of the
next salary commission.

The recommended salaries submitted by the
commission shall become effective July 1 of the next fiscal year unless the
legislature disapproves the recommended salaries submitted by the commission
through the adoption of a concurrent resolution, which shall be approved by a simple
majority of each house of the legislature, prior to adjournment sine die of the
legislative session in which the recommended salaries are submitted; provided
that any change in salary which becomes effective shall not apply to the
legislature to which the recommendation for the change in salary was submitted.

The governor shall include the salary amounts
recommended by the commission and approved by the legislature for employees of
the executive branch in the executive budget. If the salary amounts recommended
by the commission are disapproved by the legislature, the commission shall
reconvene in the November next following the legislative disapproval to review
the legislature's reasons for disapproving its salary recommendation. The
commission may submit a report of its findings and submit a new salary
recommendation to the legislature at the next regular session. The
commission's reconvening following a legislative disapproval shall not toll the
six-year cycle. [L 2006, c 299, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next